Wisconsin, session 2025, AB581.
do enact as follows:AB581,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB581,28Section 2. 20.465 (3) (bf) of the statutes is created to read:AB581,2,10920.465 (3) (bf) Disaster assistance for individuals grant program. Biennially, 10the amounts in the schedule for a disaster assistance for individuals grant program.AB581,311Section 3. 20.465 (3) (bg) of the statutes is created to read:AB581,2,131220.465 (3) (bg) Disaster assistance for businesses grant program. Biennially, 13the amounts in the schedule for a disaster assistance for businesses grant program.AB581,2,1414